Hawaii statutes.
§321‑475 Use of domestic violence
fatality review information and records. (a) Except as otherwise provided
in this part, all information and records acquired by the department during its
review of domestic violence fatalities pursuant to this part are confidential
and shall only be disclosed as necessary to carry out the purposes of this
part.

(b) Domestic violence fatality review
information and statistical compilations of data that do not contain any
information not previously publicly disclosed that would permit the
identification of any person, shall be public records.

(c) An individual participating in the
domestic violence fatality review of a victim's death shall not be questioned
in any civil or criminal proceeding regarding information presented in or an
opinion formed as a result of a domestic violence fatality review meeting.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an individual from
testifying to information obtained independently of the domestic violence
fatality review of a victim's death, or which is public information, or where
law or court order requires disclosure.

(d) Domestic violence fatality review
information held by the department as a result of domestic violence fatality
reviews conducted under this part shall not be subject to subpoena, discovery,
or introduction into evidence in any civil or criminal proceeding, except that
domestic violence fatality review information otherwise available from other
sources shall not be immune from subpoena, discovery, or introduction into
evidence through those sources solely because it was provided as required by
this part.

(e) Information collected and recommendations
derived from the review process shall be compiled for use in system reform
efforts relating to the reduction of preventable deaths, near-deaths, and
suicides resulting from domestic violence. [L 2006, c 82, pt of §1; am L 2015,
c 203, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next